California, session 20252026, AB2379.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1596.868 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1596.868. (a) (1) The department shall notify all licensed and license-exempt family daycare home providers of a person’s rights under the Fourth Amendment to the United States Constitution. The notice shall include, but is not limited to, information relating to the protections against searches and seizures of a home and detentions and arrests of a person in a home by local, state, or federal law enforcement officers and employees, including the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, without providing valid identification, a written statement of purpose, and a valid judicial warrant.(2) This notification shall be developed and provided in coordination with the training required pursuant to subdivision (b).(b) (1) The department, with the concurrence of any exclusive representative for licensed and license-exempt family daycare home providers, shall designate a statewide entity that has recent and significant experience in providing plain language, accessible childcare worker training in multiple languages to develop and provide a training program about the rights and responsibilities of a family daycare home related to a person’s rights under the Fourth Amendment to the United States Constitution, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). The training program shall include the policies limiting assistance with immigration enforcement at licensed child daycare facilities, published pursuant to Section 1597.640.(2) Commencing July 1, 2026, 60 days after the effective date of this section, the designated statewide entity shall offer the training program described in paragraph (1) to licensed and license-exempt family daycare home providers. Family daycare home providers that are licensed on the date that the act that added this section becomes effective shall complete this training no later than June 30, 2027, and family daycare home providers that are licensed after the date that the act that added this section becomes effective shall complete this training within 12 months of their initial licensing.(c) A violation of this section is not subject to criminal, civil, or administrative penalties, and shall not result in a licensee being subject to citation under this act.SEC. 2. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:To ensure guaranteed access to vital childcare without fear of harassment, intimidation, or unwarranted searches by United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement officials, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.